Maryland, session 2026, HB1107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
4–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Cohabitant” means a person who has had a sexual relationship with the
respondent and resided with the respondent in the home for a period of at least 90 days
within 1 year before the filing of the petition.
4–513.
In this Part III of this subtitle, “victim of domestic violence” means an individual
who has received deliberate, severe, and demonstrable physical injury, or is in fear of
imminent deliberate, severe, and demonstrable physical injury from a current or former
spouse, or a current or former cohabitant, as defined in § 4–501 of this subtitle.
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(P) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–864 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE SAME MANNER THEY APPLY TO CARRIERS.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:

HOUSE BILL 1107 3
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for the
delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in accordance
with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE TO VICTIMS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE FOR AESTHETIC SERVICES AND
RESTORATIVE CARE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–864 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 4–513 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE TO
VICTIMS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE FOR AESTHETIC SERVICES AND RESTORATIVE
CARE RELATED TO SCARS OR SCARRING:
(1) PROVIDED FOR THE TREATMENT OF PHYSICAL INJURIES CAUSED
BY DOMESTIC VIOLENCE; AND
(2) DETERMINED TO BE MEDICALLY NECESSARY BY A PHYSICIAN WHO
IS LICENSED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.

HOUSE BILL 1107
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.